Utah statutes.
17-36-46.   Reserve fund for capital improvements -- Creation -- Purpose --
Limitation.
(1)  The legislative body of any county may establish and maintain, by
ordinance, a cumulative reserve fund to be accumulated by levy for the purpose
of financing the purchase of real property and the cost of planning,
constructing or rehabilitating public buildings or other public works and
capital improvements.
(2) (a)  Before a reserve fund under Subsection (1) may be established, the
county legislative body shall designate by ordinance the specific purpose for
which the fund is established.
(b)  Except as provided in Section 17-36-50, all funds in a reserve fund under
Subsection (1) shall be expended for the designated purposes.
